Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1335
State highways; access; use of adjoining property; permit; rules and regulations; violation; penalty.

Any person who shall construct, use, or permit to be used on property owned or occupied by such person any private entrance or exit, approach road, facility, thing, or appurtenance upon or connected to a highway right-of-way without a permit from the department, when a permit is required, or who shall construct, use, or permit to be used a private entrance or exit, approach road, facility, advertising, advertising signs, displays, or other advertising devices, thing, or appurtenance upon or connected to any highway right-of-way without complying with the rules and regulations prescribed by the department or with the conditions of a permit issued by the department to such person, shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor. Each and every day that such violation continues after the department issues written notification to the violator may constitute a separate offense.

Laws 1955, c. 148, § 35, p. 433;

Laws 1961, c. 195, § 5, p. 597;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 212.